California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 one or more categories of Medi-Cal providers, or for one or more products or services rendered, or any combination thereof, if the resulting reductions to any category of Medi-Cal providers, in the aggregate, total no more than 10 percent.

(B) The adjustments authorized in subparagraph (A) shall be implemented only if the director determines that, for each affected product, service, or provider category, the payments resulting from the adjustment comply with subdivision (m).

(e) Notwithstanding this section, payments to hospitals that are not under contract with the department pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) for inpatient hospital services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and that are subject to former Section 14166.245 shall be governed by that section.

(f) Notwithstanding this section,
 both of the following apply:

(1) Payments to providers that are paid pursuant to Article 3.8 (commencing with Section 14126) shall be governed by that article.

(2) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), for dates of service on and after June 1, 2011, Medi-Cal reimbursement rates for intermediate care facilities for the developmentally disabled licensed pursuant to subdivision (e), (g), or (h) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, and facilities providing continuous skilled nursing care to developmentally disabled individuals pursuant to the pilot project established by Section 14132.20, as determined by the applicable methodology for setting reimbursement rates for these facilities, shall not exceed the reimbursement rates that were applicable to providers in the 2008–09 rate year.

(B) (i) If Section 14105.07 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code during the 2011–12 Regular Session of the Legislature, subparagraph (A) shall become inoperative.

(ii) If Section 14105.07 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code during the 2011–12 Regular Session of the Legislature, then for dates of service on and after June 1, 2011, payments to intermediate care facilities for the developmentally disabled licensed pursuant to subdivision (e), (g), or (h) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, and facilities providing continuous skilled nursing care to developmentally disabled individuals pursuant to the pilot project established by Section 14132.20, shall be governed by the applicable methodology for setting reimbursement rates for these facilities and by Section 14105.07.

(g) The department may enter into contracts with a
 vendor for the purposes of implementing this section on a bid or nonbid basis. In order to achieve maximum cost savings, the Legislature declares that an expedited process for contracts under this subdivision is necessary. Therefore, contracts entered into to implement this section and all contract amendments and change orders shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(h) To the extent applicable, all of the following services, facilities, and payments shall be exempt from the payment reductions specified in subdivision (d):

(1) Acute hospital inpatient services that are paid under contracts pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(2) Federally qualified health center services, including those facilities deemed to have federally
 qualified health center status pursuant to a waiver pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1315(a)).

(3) Rural health clinic services.

(4) Payments to facilities owned or operated by the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services.

(5) Hospice services.

(6) Contract services, as designated by the director pursuant to subdivision (k).

(7) Payments to providers to the extent that the payments are funded by means of a certified public expenditure or an intergovernmental transfer pursuant to Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. This paragraph shall apply to payments
 described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) only to the extent that they are also exempt from reduction pursuant to subdivision (l).

(8) Services pursuant to local assistance contracts and interagency agreements to the extent the funding is not included in the funds appropriated to the department in the annual Budget Act.

(9) Breast and cervical cancer treatment provided pursuant to Section 14007.71 and as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.18 or Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 104160) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code.

(10) The Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment (Family PACT) Program pursuant to subdivision (aa) of Section 14132.

(11) (A) Effective for
 dates of service on or after July 1, 2015, or the effective date of any necessary federal approvals as required by subdivisions (n) and (o), whichever is later, dental services and applicable ancillary services.

(B) For dental managed care plans that contract with the department pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), payments pursuant to contract amendments or change orders effective on or after July 1, 2015, or the effective date of any necessary federal approvals as required by subdivisions (n) and (o), whichever is later.

(12) For dates of service on and after January 1, 2022, or the effective date of any necessary federal approvals as required by subdivisions (n) and (o), whichever is later, providers of complex rehabilitation technology and complex rehabilitation technology services, as described in Section 14132.85.

(13) For dates of service on and after July 1, 2022, or the effective date of any necessary federal approvals as required by subdivisions (n) and (o), whichever is later, all of the following services and providers:

(A) Nurses, including certified nurse-midwives, nurse anesthetists, certified pediatric nurse practitioners, certified family nurse practitioners, and group certified pediatric nurse practitioners.

(B) Alternative birth centers as described in Section 14148.8.

(C) Audiologists and hearing aid dispensers as described in Section 14105.49 of this code and Section 51319 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(D) Respiratory care providers as described in Section 51316 of
 Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(E) Durable medical equipment, as described in Section 51160 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(F) Chronic dialysis clinics.

(G) Emergency medical air transportation services as described in Section 76000.10 of the Government Code.

(H) Nonemergency medical transportation services as described in Section 51323 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(I) Doula services as described in Section 14132.24.

(J) Community health worker services as described in the approved Medi-Cal State Plan.

(K) Durable medical equipment and related supplies or accessories, as described in Section 14105.48 and Section 51160 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, that is a continuous glucose monitoring system or continuous glucose monitoring system supplies and accessories, as determined by the department.

(L) Health care services delivered via remote patient monitoring, authorized pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 14124.12.

(M) Asthma prevention services as described in the approved Medi-Cal State Plan.

(N) Dyadic services as described in Section 14132.755.

(O) Medication therapy management services as described in Section 14132.969.

(P) Clinical laboratory services, as defined in Section 51137.2 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, that are 2019 Novel Coronavirus (COVID-19) diagnostic testing or specimen collection services, as determined by the department.

(Q) Blood banks, as described in Section 51052 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(R) Occupational therapy, as described in Section 51085 of the California Code of Regulations.

(S) Orthotists, as described in Section 51101 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(T) Psychologists, as described in Section 51099 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(U) Medical social work or medical social services,
 as described in Section 51147 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(V) Speech pathologists, as described in Section 51095 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(W) Outpatient heroin detoxification services, as described in Section 51116 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(X) Dispensing opticians, as described in Section 51090 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(Y) Optometrists, including optometry groups, as described in Section 51091 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(Z) Acupuncturists, as described in Section 51074 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(AA) Portable imaging services, as described in Section 51193.1 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(AB) The following primary care or specialty clinics, as determined by the department:

(i) Community clinics, as defined in Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) Free clinics, as defined in Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(iii) Surgical clinics, as defined in Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(iv) Rehabilitation clinics, as defined in Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(v) Clinics exempt from licensure under
 Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, including nonhospital county-operated community clinics.

(AC) Services provided under the California Children’s Services Program, established pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123845) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, and under the Genetically Handicapped Persons Program, established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 125125) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, as determined by the department.

(AD) Community-Based Adult Services (CBAS), as described in Section 14186.3 and as covered pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14184.201.

(14) For dates of service on and after January 1, 2023, or the effective date of any necessary federal approvals as required by subdivisions (n) and
 (o), whichever is later, both of the following providers:

(A) Podiatrists, as described in Section 51075 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Prosthetists, as described in Section 51103 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(15) For dates of service on and after January 1, 2024, or the effective date of the payments implemented pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14105.201, whichever is later, all of the following services and providers:

(A) Primary care services, including those provided by physicians or nonphysician health professionals, as defined in Section 51170.5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Obstetric care services and doula
 services as described in Section 14132.24.

(C) Outpatient mental health services that are not the financial responsibility of county mental health plans operating pursuant to Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700).

(16) (A) For dates of service on and after January 1, 2025, or the effective dates of the payments implemented pursuant to Sections 14124.163 and 14124.165, whichever is later, as applicable, all of the following services and providers:

(i) Physician and professional services subject to reimbursement pursuant to Section 14124.163.

(ii) Abortion services, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 14124.161, subject to reimbursement pursuant to Section 14124.165.

(B) If the voters approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to this part at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, this paragraph shall be inoperative as of January 1, 2025.

(i) Subject to the exception for services listed in subdivision (h), the payment reductions required by subdivision (d) shall apply to the benefits rendered by any provider who may be authorized to bill for the service, including, but not limited to, physicians, podiatrists, nurse practitioners, certified nurse-midwives, nurse anesthetists, and organized outpatient clinics.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law, for dates of service on and after June 1, 2011, Medi-Cal reimbursement rates applicable to the following classes of providers shall not exceed the reimbursement rates that were applicable to those classes of providers in the 2008–09 rate year, as
 described in subdivision (f) of Section 14105.191, reduced by 10 percent:

(1) Intermediate care facilities, excluding those facilities identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f). For purposes of this section, “intermediate care facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 51118 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) Skilled nursing facilities that are distinct parts of general acute care hospitals. For purposes of this section, “distinct part” has the same meaning as defined in Section 72041 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) Rural swing-bed facilities.

(4) Subacute care units that are, or are parts of, distinct parts of general acute care hospitals. For purposes of this paragraph, “subacute care unit” has
 the same meaning as defined in Section 51215.5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(5) Pediatric subacute care units that are, or are parts of, distinct parts of general acute care hospitals. For purposes of this paragraph, “pediatric subacute care unit” has the same meaning as defined in Section 51215.8 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(6) Adult day health care centers.

(7) Freestanding pediatric subacute care units, as defined in Section 51215.8 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(k) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement and administer this section by means of provider bulletins or similar
 instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(l) The reductions described in this section shall apply only to payments for services when the General Fund share of the payment is paid with funds directly appropriated to the department in the annual Budget Act and shall not apply to payments for services paid with funds appropriated to other departments or agencies.

(m) Notwithstanding this section, the payment reductions and adjustments provided for in subdivision (d) shall be implemented only if the director determines that the payments that result from the application of this section comply with applicable federal Medicaid program requirements and that federal financial participation will be available.

(1) In determining whether federal financial participation is available, the director shall determine
 whether the payments comply with applicable federal Medicaid program requirements, including those set forth in Section 1396a(a)(30)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) To the extent that the director determines that the payments do not comply with the federal Medicaid program requirements or that federal financial participation is not available with respect to any payment that is reduced pursuant to this section, the director shall retain the discretion to not implement the particular payment reduction or adjustment and may adjust the payment as necessary to comply with federal Medicaid program requirements.

(n) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section.

(o) (1) The payment reductions and adjustments set forth in this section
 shall not be implemented until federal approval is obtained.

(2) To the extent that federal approval is obtained for one or more of the payment reductions and adjustments in this section and Section 14105.07, the payment reductions and adjustments set forth in Section 14105.191 shall cease to be implemented for the same services provided by the same class of providers. If there is a conflict between this section and Section 14105.191, other than the provisions setting forth a payment reduction or adjustment, this section shall govern.

(3) When federal approval is obtained, the payments resulting from the application of this section shall be implemented retroactively to June 1, 2011, or on any other date or dates, as may be applicable.

(4) The director may clarify the application of this subdivision by means of
 provider bulletins or similar instructions, pursuant to subdivision (k).

(p) Adjustments to pharmacy drug product payment pursuant to this section shall no longer apply when the department determines that the average acquisition cost methodology pursuant to Section 14105.45 has been fully implemented and the department’s pharmacy budget reduction targets, consistent with payment reduction levels pursuant to this section, have been met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 55.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Note: Condition in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) was satisfied by addition of Section 14105.07 by Stats. 2011, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.193.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding paragraph (7) of subdivision (j) of Section 14105.192 and any other law, beginning June 1, 2011, reimbursement rates for freestanding pediatric subacute care units, as defined in Section 51215.8 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, shall be the applicable rate for the 2008–09 rate year, reduced by 5.75 percent, plus the projected cost of
 complying with new state or federal mandates.

(2) The department shall recalculate and publish the rates specified in paragraph (1) for any of the following reasons:

(A) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) does not approve exemption changes to the facilities subject to the skilled nursing facility quality assurance fee pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 1324.20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) If CMS does not approve any proposed modification to the methodology for calculation of the skilled nursing quality assurance fee pursuant to Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 1324.20) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) To ensure that the state does not incur any additional General
 Fund expenses for reimbursement to pediatric subacute care units for dates of service on and after June 1, 2011.

(D) If the difference in the projected skilled nursing quality assurance fee collections for the 2011–12 rate year, pursuant to Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 1324.20) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, would result in any additional General Fund expense to pay for the 2011–12 rate year reimbursement rate.

(b) The reductions described in this section shall apply only to payments for services when the General Fund share of the payment is paid with funds directly appropriated to the department in the annual Budget Act and shall not apply to payments for services paid with funds appropriated to other departments or agencies.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section
 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement and administer this section by means of provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(d) The payment reductions and adjustments provided for in this section shall be implemented only if the director determines that the payments that result from the application of this section will comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements and that federal financial participation will be available.

(1) In determining whether federal financial participation is available, the director shall determine whether the payments comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements, including those set forth in Section 1396a(a)(30)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) To the extent that the director
 determines that the payments do not comply with the federal Medicaid requirements or that federal financial participation is not available with respect to any payment that is reduced pursuant to this section, the director retains the discretion not to implement the particular payment reduction or adjustment and may adjust the payment as necessary to comply with federal Medicaid requirements.

(e) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section.

(f) This section shall not be implemented until federal approval is obtained. When federal approval is obtained, the payments resulting from the application of this section shall be implemented retroactively to June 1, 2011, or on any other date or dates as may be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 214.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.194.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 14105.191, 14105.192, and 14105.193, and for dates of service on or after August 1, 2021, the reimbursement rates for freestanding pediatric subacute care units, as defined in Section 51215.8 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, shall be determined without applying any reductions or limitations as set forth under Sections 14105.191, 14105.192, and 14105.193.

(2) For dates of service on or after August 1, 2021, and for each rate year thereafter, the department shall calculate and publish the reimbursement rates, as specified in paragraph (1), plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.

(3) For the
 2021–22 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the reimbursement rates for freestanding pediatric subacute care units shall account for, and be inclusive of, supplemental payments, as described under the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016, or Proposition 56, if the Budget Act of that fiscal year appropriates funds from the Healthcare Treatment Fund, as established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, to the department to make those supplemental payments to the freestanding pediatric subacute care units.

(4) Effective for dates of service August 1, 2022, to December 31, 2023, inclusive, the reimbursement rates for freestanding pediatric subacute care units shall continue to be the reimbursement rate in effect on August 1, 2022, inclusive of any federally authorized
 temporary Medicaid payments.

(5) Effective for dates of service on or after January 1, 2024, the department shall adopt a rate year based on the calendar year for freestanding pediatric subacute care units.

(6) Effective for rate years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the reimbursement rates for freestanding pediatric subacute care units shall be no less than the reimbursement rate, inclusive of the federally authorized temporary increased Medicaid payments or an equivalent amount described in paragraph (4), in effect for that facility on December 31, 2023.

(b) In implementing this section, the department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial
 participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(d) (1) The department may modify any methodology or provision specified in this section to the extent it deems necessary to meet the requirements of federal law or regulations, to obtain or maintain federal approval, or to ensure federal financial participation is available or is not otherwise jeopardized, only if that modification does not violate the spirit, purposes, and intent of this section.

(2) If the department
 determines that a modification is necessary pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall consult with affected providers and stakeholders to the extent practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 138.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.195.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 14105.191 and 14105.192, the department shall not seek to retroactively implement the reductions and limitations to the reimbursement for services provided by skilled nursing facilities that are distinct parts of general acute care hospitals set forth in Sections 14105.191 and 14105.192 for dates of service on or after June 1, 2011, and on or before September 30, 2013. For purposes of this section, “distinct part” has the same meaning as defined in Section 72041 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) The department shall not seek to recoup any overpayments from skilled nursing facilities that are distinct parts of general acute care hospitals resulting from the reductions and limitations to the
 reimbursement for these facilities pursuant to Sections 14105.191 and 14105.192 for dates of service on or after June 1, 2011, and on or before September 30, 2013.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of provider bulletins or notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 14.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.197.

(a) For dates of service on and after July 1, 2022, or the effective date of any necessary federal approvals as required by subdivision (b), whichever is later, the reimbursement rates or payments for all of the following services and providers may be maintained, using General Fund or other state funds appropriated to the department as the state share, at the payment levels in effect on December 31, 2021, including supplemental payments or rate increases, or both, as applicable, under the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 (Proposition 56, an initiative measure approved at the November 8, 2016, statewide general election) that were implemented with funds from the Healthcare Treatment Fund, as established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and
 Taxation Code:

(1) Case management services provided under the Medi-Cal HIV/AIDS Waiver Program.

(2) Targeted payments for qualifying providers of Community-Based Adult Services (CBAS), as described in Section 14186.3 and subdivision (d) of Section 14184.201, based on criteria established and updated by the department, which may include, but need not be limited to, higher operating costs for CBAS providers in certain areas of the state.

(3) Developmental screenings for individuals zero to three years of age, inclusive, as described in Section 14132.195.

(4) Adverse Childhood Experiences (ACEs) trauma screenings.

(5) Nonemergency medical transportation.

(6) Home health providers of medically necessary in-home services for children and adults in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service system or through home and community-based services waivers.

(7) Pediatric day health care facilities in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service system.

(b) In implementing this section, the department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section, in whole or in
 part, by means of provider bulletins or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(d) The department shall develop the eligibility criteria, methodologies, and parameters for the payments and rate increases maintained pursuant to subdivision (a), and may revise the eligibility criteria, methodologies, and parameters, for purposes including, but not limited to, obtaining or maintaining any necessary federal approvals as required by subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 91.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.200.

(a) The Medi-Cal Provider Payment Reserve Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, any interest and dividends earned on moneys in the Medi-Cal Provider Payment Reserve Fund shall be retained in the fund and used solely for the purposes specified in this section.

(c) (1) Subject to an appropriation made by the Legislature, the department shall use the funds transferred to the Medi-Cal Provider Payment Reserve Fund pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 14199.82 for purposes of funding targeted increases to Medi-Cal payments or other investments that advance access, quality, and
 equity for Medi-Cal beneficiaries and promote provider participation in the Medi-Cal program.

(2) The expenditures of funds appropriated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Increased costs incurred as a result of the reimbursement requirements established in Section 14105.201.

(B) Transfers authorized in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 129385 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) Transfers, or an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, to the Small and Rural Hospital Relief Fund, as established in Section 130077 of the Health and Safety Code, in the amount of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in state fiscal year 2023–24 to support the Small and Rural Hospital Relief Program for seismic
 assessment and construction.

(d) The department shall provide an annual report to all health plans accounting for the funds deposited in, and expended from, the Medi-Cal Provider Payment Reserve Fund, in a time and manner deemed appropriate by the director.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the funds in the Medi-Cal Provider Payment Reserve Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code.

(f) If the voters approve the addition of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) to this part at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, this section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 56) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 57.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.   Inoperative on date prescribed by Section 14199.103.   Repealed one year after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14199.103.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.201.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for dates of service no sooner than January 1, 2024, or on the effective date of any necessary federal approvals as required by subdivision (d), whichever is later, the reimbursement rates for the following services, as determined in accordance with subdivision (f), shall be the greater of 87.5 percent of the lowest maximum allowance established by the federal Medicare
 Program for the same or similar services or the level of reimbursement, which shall account for, and be inclusive of, the exemption of these services from payment reductions pursuant to Section 14105.192, and supplemental payments or rate increases, or both, as applicable, under the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 (Proposition 56, an initiative measure approved at the November 8, 2016, statewide general election) that were implemented with funds from the Healthcare Treatment Fund, as established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, in effect as of December 31, 2023, as determined by the department:

(A) Primary care services, including those provided by physicians or nonphysician health professionals, as defined in Section 51170.5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Obstetric care
 services, and doula services as described in Section 14132.24.

(C) Outpatient mental health services that are not the financial responsibility of county mental health plans operating pursuant to Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700).

(2) The department shall annually review and revise the reimbursement rates in accordance with paragraph (1) based on changes to the lowest maximum allowance established by the federal Medicare Program for the same or similar services. Any revisions to the reimbursement rates determined in accordance with paragraph (1) shall be considered as part of the annual budget development process and take effect beginning on January 1, 2025, and each subsequent January 1 thereafter, of the calendar year following the department’s annual review.

(3) The department shall develop and implement
 a methodology for establishing reimbursement rates or payments for the services described in paragraph (1) where there is no specified maximum allowable rate established by the federal Medicare Program. The department shall review this methodology annually and may, in its sole discretion, modify the methodology on a prospective basis.

(b) (1) (A) For contract periods during which subdivision (a) is implemented, each Medi-Cal managed care plan shall reimburse a network provider furnishing the services subject to subdivision (a) at least the amount the network provider would be paid for those services in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system, as set forth by the department in the approved Medi-Cal State Plan and guidance issued pursuant to subdivision
 (e).

(B) Medi-Cal managed care plans that reimburse a network provider furnishing the services identified in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) on a capitated basis shall ensure that the network provider receives reimbursement that is equal to, or projected to be equal to, the level of reimbursement required in subparagraph (A) for the applicable services and, as applicable, shall increase reimbursement to the network provider to comply with this subparagraph.

(2) (A) The department shall direct Medi-Cal managed care plans to reimburse eligible providers furnishing the services subject to subdivision (a) in accordance with paragraph (1) using one or more methodologies pursuant to Section 438.6(c)
 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and as set forth by the department in guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (e).

(B) Commencing with the first managed care rating period for which the department documents in the annual rate certification that the base period data submitted and attested to by Medi-Cal managed care plans that is used by the department for the development of capitation rates for the Medi-Cal managed care delivery system reflects the increased reimbursement levels for services subject to subdivision (a), the department may elect to discontinue some or all of the directed payment methodologies implemented pursuant to subparagraph (A) following consultation with affected stakeholders and the department’s determination that the methodologies are administratively burdensome and likely to be no longer necessary to achieve, in aggregate, the reimbursement levels described in paragraph (1).

(3) The department may require Medi-Cal managed care plans and network providers of the applicable services to submit information the department deems necessary to implement and monitor compliance with this subdivision, at the times and in the form and manner specified by the department.

(c) (1) The payments implemented pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be supported by the managed care organization provider tax revenue, pursuant to Article
 7.2 (commencing with Section 14199.90), or other state funds appropriated to the department as the state share for this purpose, including, but not limited to, funds transferred to the Medi-Cal Provider Payment Reserve Fund in accordance with Sections 14105.200 and 14199.82 and to the Healthcare Treatment Fund in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, increases to fee-for-service reimbursement rates and managed care directed payments that are made pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) constitute increases in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and all other fee-for-service
 supplemental payments and managed care directed payments for the services identified in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) that are made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be discontinued on the date the payments implemented pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) are effective.

(d) In implementing this section, the department shall seek any federal approvals that it deems necessary. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, information notices, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory
 action.

(f) The department shall develop the methodologies and parameters for the payments implemented pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), and may revise the methodologies and parameters, for purposes including, but not limited to, obtaining or maintaining any necessary federal approvals as required by subdivision
 (d).

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101.

(2) “Network provider” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(h) The Legislature finds and declares that this section, as it
 pertains to funding made available for expenditure pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, is consistent and in accordance with the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 (Proposition 56, an initiative measure approved at the November 8, 2016, statewide general election).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 24, Sec. 1.   (SB 125)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.2.

(a) The allowable markup payable for the dispensing of medical supplies, including diabetic supplies except as indicated in subdivision (b), by assistive device and sickroom supply dealers and pharmacies shall not exceed 23 percent of the estimated acquisition cost of the item dispensed, as defined by the department.

(b) Payment for diabetic test strips, lancets, and insulin syringes shall not exceed the estimated acquisition cost of the item dispensed, as defined by the department, plus a fee equal to the maximum professional fee component used in the payment for legend generic drug types.

(c) In determining the estimated acquisition costs of products pursuant to this section,